Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Restricted Operations

§ 13-3-201.
Acquisition of real estate.

No bank shall purchase, hold, convey or lease real estate except for the following purposes:

Real estate and buildings necessary to transact the business of a bank including its banking offices and other premises in the same buildings to rent as a source of income. The property shall not be carried on the books of the bank as an asset in an amount in excess of one hundred percent (100%) of the bank’s capital and surplus and, with the prior approval of the state banking commissioner, undivided profits and reserve accounts. When any bank ceases to use the real estate and improvements for banking purposes, it shall, within five (5) years from the date of vacation of the premises, sell the property;

Real estate which is purchased by or conveyed to the bank in satisfaction of or on account of debts previously contracted in the course of its business;

Real estate which is purchased at execution sale or acquired by decree under securities held by it.

Any real estate acquired as provided in subsections (a)(ii) and (iii) of this section shall be entered on the books as other real estate at not more than acquisition cost, or appraised fair market value, whichever is less, shall be appraised at least every twenty-four (24) months, and shall be sold within ten (10) years after title to the property is acquired. Any real estate acquired prior to July 1, 1992 shall be carried on the bank’s books at the lower of the bank’s book value for that property as of July 1, 1992 or appraised value.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

If any real estate is not sold within the time required in this section, it shall not thereafter be carried as an asset of the bank. This section shall not apply to real estate purchased with funds other than the capital and resources of the banking business nor to real estate held in trust.

Any bank acquiring any real estate in any manner other than as provided by this section shall immediately charge it to a reserve for losses or to undivided profits.

Any appraisal required under subsection (b) of this section for property which is carried on the bank’s books at a value equal to or exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) shall be conducted by a real estate appraiser certified or licensed by the state in which the property is located, who is not an officer or director of the bank and whose reports are acceptable to the state banking commissioner.

Any appraisal required under subsection (b) of this section may be waived by the state banking commissioner upon written application from the bank.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 16, 17; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-116, 10-117; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-117, 35-118; Laws 1951, ch. 29, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-12, 13-13; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1983, ch. 101, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1989, ch. 11, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 75, § 2; 1999, ch. 42, § 2; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (e), substituted “two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00).”

Cross references. —

As to powers of savings and loan associations relative to real estate, see §

13-7-104

.

§ 13-3-202.
Investment in stock of other corporations.

No bank shall invest any of its assets in the capital stock of any other corporation except as follows:

In the capital stock of a federal reserve bank;

In stock acquired to save a loss on a preexisting debt which shall be sold within twelve (12) months from the date acquired unless a longer period of time is permitted by the state banking commissioner;

In the stock of a small business investment company as defined by the federal Small Business Investment Act of 1958 as amended;

In the stock of the federal national mortgage association;

In the stock of a corporation formed solely for the purpose of making agricultural loans and borrowing or discounting loans from banks and associations of the farm credit system as authorized in the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (P.L. 92-181), subject to such conditions and limitations as the state banking commissioner may prescribe;

In the stock of a bank service corporation pursuant to W.S.

13-9-101

;

In mutual fund shares whose underlying securities consist solely of obligations of the United States treasury or other federal agency obligations;

In the stock of a federal home loan bank established under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act;

In the stock of an operating subsidiary in accordance with W.S.

13-3-204

;

In the stock of a bank engaged exclusively in providing services to state or national banks or their subsidiary corporations, bank holding companies or their subsidiary corporations, or other financial institutions, hereinafter referred to as a “banker’s bank,” subject to the following limitations:

The investing bank may not acquire or retain ownership, control or power to vote more than five percent (5%) of any class of voting stock or securities of a banker’s bank; and

The investing bank may not invest in a banker’s bank more than ten percent (10%) of its capital stock and paid in and unimpaired surplus.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 32; R.S. 1931, § 10-133; C.S. 1945, § 35-136; W.S. 1957, § 13-64; Laws 1963, ch. 113, § 1; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 68, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1995, ch. 111, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, § 2; 2001, ch. 73, § 1; 2012, ch. 81, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government” after “agency obligations” in (a)(vii).

Laws 2012, ch. 81, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Small Business Investment Act. —

The federal Small Business Investment Act, referred to in subsection (a)(iii), appears mainly as 15 U.S.C. § 661 et seq.

Farm Credit Act. —

The federal Farm Credit Act, referred to in subsection (a)(v), appears mainly as 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.

Federal Home Loan Bank Act. —

The Federal Home Loan Bank Act, referred to in subsection (a)(viii), appears as 12 U.S.C. § 1421 et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of § 4 (c) (8) of Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1843 (c)(8)), permitting bank holding companies to acquire shares in companies whose activities are closely related to banking, 31 ALR Fed 520.

§ 13-3-203.
Borrowing.

A bank may borrow on and pledge assets of the bank as security for temporary purposes. If it appears that any bank is habitually borrowing for the purpose of reloaning the state banking commissioner may require the bank to pay off the borrowed money. A bank is not prevented from rediscounting in good faith and endorsing any of its negotiable notes.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

No bank shall sell or rediscount “without recourse” any notes or other negotiable securities on which the bank is in any way liable under purchase or guarantee agreements and any purchaser of notes or negotiable securities purchased “without recourse” shall look to the maker or guarantor of the notes or negotiable securities only for payment.

Any bank may borrow money from a federal reserve bank or federal home loan bank in the manner required by the rules, laws and regulations of the federal reserve banks or federal home loan bank, as applicable. A bank borrowing pursuant to this section may pledge assets of the bank as security for the borrowing.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

State chartered banks may engage in other borrowing activities subject to approval of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 38; R.S. 1931, § 10-140; Laws 1933, ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 35-143; W.S. 1957, § 13-28; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1983, ch. 19, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 111, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to borrowing by savings and loan associations, see §§

13-7-401

and

13-7-402

.

As to penalty for violation, see §

13-10-104

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of corporate officers to mortgage or pledge corporate personal property, 62 ALR2d 712.

§ 13-3-204.
Operating subsidiaries; application; fee; new activities.

With prior written approval of the commissioner, a bank may purchase for its own account the stock in a corporation to perform functions that are authorized for the bank or that are usual or incidental to the business of banking, subject to the following conditions:

The bank shall own or control eighty percent (80%) or more of the voting stock of the subsidiary corporation;

No officer, director or shareholder of the bank or any person in a substantially similar controlling or governing position of its bank holding company shall otherwise have a direct or indirect pecuniary interest in the subsidiary corporation;

All transactions between the bank and the subsidiary shall be subject to any limitations and restrictions applicable under the laws of this state and the United States;

All provisions of banking law applicable to the operations of the bank shall apply equally to the operations of the subsidiary;

Each subsidiary shall be subject to examination and supervision by the commissioner in the same manner and to the same extent as the bank. If the commissioner determines the subsidiary is violating any applicable law or that operation of the subsidiary is adversely affecting the safety and soundness of the bank, the commissioner may order the bank to dispose of all or any part of the subsidiary upon such terms as the commissioner deems appropriate or take any other appropriate administrative action authorized in this act.

The bank shall file an application for permission to operate a subsidiary with the commissioner, together with an application fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner. The fee shall be deposited as provided in W.S. 13-2-210(b) and may be expended as provided in that subsection. The application shall include:

The name and location of the subsidiary and the date the subsidiary will commence operations;

A description of the activities and nature of the business to be conducted at the subsidiary; and

A description of the nature of the bank’s investment in the subsidiary.

The commissioner shall approve the application and issue a certificate of authority to operate the subsidiary to the bank within twenty (20) days after receipt of the completed application and fee unless the commissioner finds:

The proposed activity or activities to be performed at the subsidiary are not activities the bank is authorized to perform and are not activities that are usual or incidental to the business of banking; or

Operation of the subsidiary will adversely affect the safety and soundness of the bank.

With the prior approval of the commissioner, an approved subsidiary of a bank may engage in a new activity. The bank shall file a written application for approval of the new activity with the commissioner in the form prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall approve the application in writing no later than twenty (20) days after receipt of the application if the commissioner finds that the proposed new activity is an activity that is authorized for the bank or is usual or incidental to the business of the bank and the proposed new activity will not adversely affect the safety and soundness of the bank.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a bank from establishing and operating a subsidiary in a state other than Wyoming, provided that the bank complies with all applicable provisions of Wyoming law, the law of the state where the subsidiary will be located and federal law.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1; 2001, ch. 73, § 1; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of seven hundred dollars ($700.00)” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).